Texas statutes.
EDUCATION CODE

TITLE 3. HIGHER EDUCATION

SUBTITLE H. RESEARCH IN HIGHER EDUCATION

CHAPTER 149. GEO-TECHNOLOGY RESEARCH INSTITUTE

Sec. 149.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Center" means the Houston Advanced Research Center.

(2) "Institute" means the Geo-Technology Research Institute.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 149.002. GEO-TECHNOLOGY RESEARCH INSTITUTE. The Geo-Technology Research Institute is located at the center, a research consortium that includes The University of Texas at Austin, Texas A&M University, Rice University, and the University of Houston.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1427, Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 1999.

Sec. 149.003. ADMINISTRATION. The board of directors of the center directs the administration of the institute.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 149.004. DUTIES. (a) The institute shall conduct basic and applied research and analysis in geoscience, geo-technology, and related fields, including the implementation of technological advances and development of integrated databases.

(b) Results of the research of the institute shall be made available to state agencies, other public bodies and officials, industry, and private citizens.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1427, Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 1999.

Sec. 149.005. FUNDS. (a) The institute may receive:

(1) funds from the federal government or the state government, including funds from:

(A) direct appropriations to the institute;

(B) an agreement under Chapter 771 or 791, Government Code; or

(C) a contract under Subtitle D, Title 10, Government Code, including funds received as a vendor in a proprietary purchase made under Section 2155.067, Government Code; and

(2) pledges or gifts from private sources.

(b) The board of directors of the center shall manage and approve disbursement of all funds, pledges, and gifts.

(c) The use of state funds is limited to expenditures for basic and applied research and analysis, excluding construction costs.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1427, Sec. 3, eff. June 19, 1999.